Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.104

Settlement and payment of accounts—Duty to require.

Upon receipt of information from the state auditor as provided in *RCW 43.09.050(5) as now or hereafter amended, the director of financial management shall require all persons who have received any moneys belonging to the state and have not accounted therefor, to settle their accounts and make payment thereof.

[ 1979 c 151 s 116; 1977 ex.s. c 144 s 10.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.09.050 was amended by 1992 c 118 s 6, changing subsection (5) to subsection (6).